Idaho, session 2026, S1428.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for
the Division of Early Learning and Development the following amounts to be
expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $600,000 $600,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $426,300 $478,600 3,337,900 4,242,800
TOTAL $426,300 $478,600 $3,937,900 $4,842,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $485,500 $18,500 $23,000 $15,473,000 $16,000,000
III. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $14,500 $14,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 5,500 5,500
TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
GRAND TOTAL $911,800 $497,100 $43,000 $19,410,900 $20,862,800
SECTION 2. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Youth Safety and Permanency the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs and expense classes from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $250,000 $250,000
II. FOSTER & ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $431,900 $431,900
GRAND TOTAL $250,000 $431,900 $681,900


SECTION 3. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Family and Community Partnerships $180,000 from the Cooperative
Welfare (Federal) Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the
period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, for the purpose of the Kinship
Navigation Grant.
SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Health and Welfare Division of Early Learning and De-
velopment is hereby increased by eight (8.00) for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare Divi-
sion of Early Learning and Development any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of Health and Wel-
fare Division of Early Learning and Development for the Idaho Child Care Pro-
gram in fiscal year 2026, in an amount not to exceed $14,000,000, to be used
for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 6. REQUIRING A REPORT FOR THE IDAHO HOME VISITING PROGRAM. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall submit a report to the Joint Finance-
Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2026, identifying outcomes and re-
turn on investment for moneys appropriated for the Idaho Home Visiting Pro-
gram. The format and content of this report will be determined in consul-
tation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Ser-
vices Office.
SECTION 7. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM CAPACITY. (1) Of the amount appro-
priated or reappropriated for year two of the Idaho Child Care Program Capac-
ity through the Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund, the Department of Health
and Welfare shall prioritize: executing contracts, programs and grants to
expand the availability of licensed, license-exempt, and unlicensed home-
based child care, out-of-school child care programs, or center-based child
care. No less than $9 million shall be reserved for home-based child care,
out-of-school child care programs, and underserved children. For the pur-
poses of this funding, underserved populations are foster children, chil-
dren with disabilities, infants and toddlers, children needing non-tradi-
tional hours care, homeless children, and school-aged children. After all
qualifying providers are approved, the department may make available to all
child care providers unused funding from the set-aside. The funds shall be
used to start or expand capacity for such programs and may not be used to sup-
plant existing costs.
(2) The director of the Department of Health and Welfare shall not allo-
cate funds:
(a) For construction or major renovations as defined in 45 CFR 98.2;


(b) For activities prohibited by 45 CFR 98.56;
(c) For minor remodeling;
(d) To a school district;
(e) To any provider who is currently under investigation by the depart-
ment, the attorney general, or a county prosecutor for fraud or the mis-
use of public funds; or
(f) To any provider who has admitted or was previously found by a court,
administrative tribunal, jury, or other neutral factfinder to have com-
mitted fraud or misused public funds.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2)(e) of this section, a provider shall
not be deemed to be under investigation solely on the basis of having re-
ceived a civil investigation demand requesting information, where no subse-
quent investigative or enforcement action has been taken.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Di-
vision of Early Learning and Development may transfer moneys appropriated
for personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Section
67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 9. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare
Division of Youth Safety and Permanency may transfer moneys appropriated
for personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Section
67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Di-
vision of Youth Safety and Permanency is hereby exempted from the provision
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center Program for all moneys appropriated to the
division for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 11. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 12. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare Di-
vision of Youth Safety and Permanency is hereby exempted from the provision
of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center Program for all moneys appropriated to the
division for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 12 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 11 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.